test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-pimisin_gt-norm.yaml
      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nika-pimisinin   # I will lie, I will lie down, I will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg+Var/East: nika-pimisin   # I will lie, I will lie down, I will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kika-pimisinin   # you will lie, you will lie down, you will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg+Var/East: kika-pimisin   # you will lie, you will lie down, you will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: ka-pimisin   # he/she will lie, he/she will lie down, he/she will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nika-pimisininân   # we will lie, we will lie down, we will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kika-pimisinânaw, kika-pimisinaw]   # we and you will lie, we and you will lie down, we and you will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kika-pimisinâwâw   # you all will lie, you all will lie down, you all will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: ka-pimisinwak   # they will lie, they will lie down, they will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-pimisinithiwa   # another/others will lie, another/others will lie down, another/others will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+X: [ka-pimisininâniwiw, ka-pimisininâniwan]   # someone will lie, someone will lie down, someone will lie extended
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ka-pimisiniyân   # I will lie, I will lie down, I will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg+Var/East: ka-pimisinân   # I will lie, I will lie down, I will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ka-pimisiniyan, ka-pimisiniyin]   # you will lie, you will lie down, you will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg+Var/East: ka-pimisinan   # I will lie, I will lie down, I will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ka-pimisihk   # he/she will lie, he/she will lie down, he/she will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ka-pimisiniyâhk   # we will lie, we will lie down, we will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl+Var/East: ka-pimisinâhk   # we will lie, we will lie down, we will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: ka-pimisiniyahk   # we and you will lie, we and you will lie down, we and you will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl+Var/East: ka-pimisinahk   # we and you will lie, we and you will lie down, we and you will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ka-pimisiniyîk   # you all will lie, you all will lie down, you all will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl+Var/East: ka-pimisinîk   # you all will lie, you all will lie down, you all will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: ka-pimisihkwâw   # they will lie, they will lie down, they will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ka-pimisinithit   # another/others will lie, another/others will lie down, another/others will lie extended
      PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+X: [ka-pimisininâniwik, ka-pimisininâniwahk, ka-pimisinihk]   # someone will lie, someone will lie down, someone will lie extended
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ta-pimisiniyân   # I lie, I lie down, I lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg+Var/East: ta-pimisinân   # I lie, I lie down, I lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ta-pimisiniyan, ta-pimisiniyin]   # you lie, you lie down, you lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg+Var/East: ta-pimisinan   # I lie, I lie down, I lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ta-pimisihk   # he/she lies, he/she lies down, he/she lies extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ta-pimisiniyâhk   # we lie, we lie down, we lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl+Var/East: ta-pimisinâhk   # we lie, we lie down, we lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: ta-pimisiniyahk   # we and you lie, we and you lie down, we and you lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl+Var/East: ta-pimisinahk   # we and you lie, we and you lie down, we and you lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ta-pimisiniyîk   # you all lie, you all lie down, you all lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl+Var/East: ta-pimisinîk   # you all lie, you all lie down, you all lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: ta-pimisihkwâw   # they lie, they lie down, they lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ta-pimisinithit   # another/others lie, another/others lie down, another/others lie extended
      PV/ta+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+X: [ta-pimisininâniwik, ta-pimisininâniwahk, ta-pimisinihk]   # someone lies, someone lies down, someone lies extended
      

      # Fut # Cond
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: pimisiniyâni   # when I lie, when I lie down, when I lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg+Var/East: pimisinâni   # when I lie, when I lie down, when I lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: [pimisiniyani, pimisiniyini]   # when you lie, when you lie down, when you lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg+Var/East: pimisinani   # when I lie, when I lie down, when I lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: [pimisinici, pimisihki]   # when he/she lies, when he/she lies down, when he/she lies extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: pimisiniyâhki   # when we lie, when we lie down, when we lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl+Var/East: pimisinâhki   # when we lie, when we lie down, when we lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: pimisiniyahki   # when we and you lie, when we and you lie down, when we and you lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl+Var/East: pimisinahki   # when we and you lie, when we and you lie down, when we and you lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: pimisiniyîko   # when you all lie, when you all lie down, when you all lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl+Var/East: pimisinîko   # when you all lie, when you all lie down, when you all lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: [pimisinitwâwi, pimisihkwâwi]   # when they lie, when they lie down, when they lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: pimisinithici   # when another/others lie, when another/others lie down, when another/others lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+X: [pimisihki, pimisihkwâwi]   # when someone lies, when someone lies down, when someone lies extended
      

      # Imp # Imm
      pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: pimisini   # (you) lie now, (you) lie down now, (you) lie extended now
      pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: pimisinitân   # let you and us lie now, let you and us lie down now, let you and us lie extended now
      pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: pimisinik   # (you all) lie now, (you all) lie down now, (you all) lie extended now
      

      # Imp # Del
      pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: pimisinîhkan   # (you) lie later, (you) lie down later, (you) lie extended later
      pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: pimisinîhkahk   # let you and us lie later, let you and us lie down later, let you and us lie extended later
      pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: pimisinîhkîk   # (you all) lie later, (you all) lie down later, (you all) lie extended later
      
